Idaho, session 2026, H0577.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-443, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-443. LICENSE PLATES TO BE FURNISHED BY DEPARTMENT -- FORM AND
CONTENTS. (1) The assessor or the department shall furnish to every owner
whose vehicle is registered or licensed by that office, pursuant to sections
49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, one (1) license plate for vehicles regis-
tered under the provisions of section 49-406, 49-406A or 49-408, Idaho Code,
or a motorcycle, trailer, truck-tractor, or semitrailer; one (1) restricted
vehicle license plate for all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles and
motorbikes licensed pursuant to this chapter; and two (2) license plates
for every other motor vehicle. If a vehicle is issued one (1) plate only,
that plate shall be displayed in accordance with the provisions of section
49-428, Idaho Code. For vehicles registered under the provisions of section
49-407, Idaho Code, the applicant shall provide one (1) plate to be displayed
on the rear of the vehicle.
(a) Commencing January 1, 1992, the color and design of the plates shall
be comparable to the color and design of the statehood centennial issue
of license plates with blue numerals and letters on a multicolored red,
white and blue background. Each license plate must bear upon on its face
the inscriptions "Famous Potatoes" and "Scenic Idaho." The restricted
vehicle license plate for all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles
and motorbikes shall be a white background with black numerals and let-
ters, with "Idaho Restricted Vehicle" and the year of its expiration on
its face and no other inscription. The restricted vehicle license plate
shall be the same size required for the motorcycle license plate.
(b) Every license plate shall have displayed upon on it the registra-
tion number assigned to the vehicle and its owner and the name "Idaho,"
which may be abbreviated. The plates issued under the provisions of
section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, and the required letters and numerals,
including an identification of the county in which the motor vehicle to
which the plates will be affixed is registered, shall be of sufficient
size to be plainly readable from a distance of seventy-five (75) feet
during daylight, and each license plate and registration sticker shall


be treated with a fully reflectorized material according to specifica-
tions prescribed by the board.
(2) License plates shall be valid for a period of ten (10) years begin-
ning with the date of issuance of new plates. At the end of the ninth year,
the registered owner shall receive notice of the date upon which the plates
will expire as long as they are readable and legible and comply with section
49-428, Idaho Code. For specialty license plate programs discontinued pur-
suant to the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code, a registrant with a
specialty license plate currently registered under the program may use such
license plate for up to ten (10) years from the date of issuance as long as the
license plate is readable and legible. This provision is intended to per-
mit the use of the specialty plate by the registrant regardless of the num-
ber of persons who purchase the specialty plate. The registrant shall be re-
quired to pay the special plate program fees provided for specialty plates
pursuant to this chapter. Such fees shall be deposited into the state high-
way account. For purposes of section 49-434, Idaho Code, as it applies to
commercial vehicles, and section 49-435, Idaho Code, the department shall
provide new plates bearing the same number or, upon request from the regis-
tered owner, the next available number.
(3) If a license plate number has expired as provided in subsection (2)
of this section and registration is not renewed within sixty (60) days of its
expiration, the related plate number shall be available for use by another
registrant. To obtain a specific number in the recycled license plate num-
ber file, the owner of a registered vehicle may contact the county regarding
availability. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to vehi-
cles registered under the provisions of section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, and
section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, as it applies to noncommercial vehicles.
(4) License plates issued for vehicles required to be registered in
accordance with the provisions of sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code,
shall be issued color-coded red, white or blue registration validation
stickers showing the year of registration. Each registration validation
sticker shall bear a number from 1 through 12, which number shall correspond
to the month of the calendar year in which the registration of the vehicle
expires and shall be affixed to the lower right-hand corner of the plates
within the outlined rectangular area.
(5) License plates for utility trailers registered under the provi-
sions of section 49-402A, Idaho Code, that are issued for five (5) or ten (10)
years and license plates for rental utility trailers registered under the
provisions of section 49-434, Idaho Code, that are issued for up to five (5)
years shall use the design in effect on the date of manufacture. If a design
change occurs, plates from the effective date of the design change shall be
manufactured using the new design. Unexpired plates need not be reissued to
conform to a design change.
(6) For license plates that are lost, stolen, mutilated, or illegible,
the owner shall apply for a duplicate or substitute. The assessor shall also
furnish for each registration, and to validate the license plate, a pres-
sure-sensitive, uniquely numbered, color-coded red, white or blue regis-
tration sticker, except for trailers and semitrailers registered under the
provisions in section 49-434, Idaho Code. License plates issued for state,
county and city motor vehicles shall be valid for ten (10) years pursuant


to subsection (2) of this section and remain on the vehicle for which issued
from year to year and need no renewal or validation sticker.
(7) Whenever a vehicle is completely destroyed by fire or accident and
the operator submits satisfactory proof of that destruction to the depart-
ment or appropriate assessor's office, or the owner wishes to transfer the
remaining registration, use increment and fees shall be transferred to the
replacement vehicle for a service transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00),
which fee shall be retained by the registering authority. None of the orig-
inal fees shall be subject to refund.
(8) The department shall furnish a printed or an electronic copy of the
registration card to every owner whose vehicle is registered under sections
49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code.
(9) The board shall have authority to require the return to the depart-
ment of all license plates and registration stickers upon termination of the
lawful use of them by the owner.
(10) The board may promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-443B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-443B. LICENSE PLATES FOR STATE VEHICLES AND VEHICLES BELONGING TO
TAXING DISTRICTS. (1) License plates for state vehicles and vehicles belong-
ing to taxing districts shall be valid for a period of ten (10) years pursuant
to such time as they are in compliance with section 49-443(2), Idaho Code,
and shall remain on the vehicle to which it is issued until transferred to
another vehicle or until it is canceled by the department. The department
shall be reimbursed by state agencies and the taxing districts for the cost
of providing license plates. The department may develop rules to administer
this license plate program.
(2) Each license plate issued pursuant to this section shall bear a des-
ignator to identify the agency, entity or office to which a vehicle belongs.
The designators shall be as follows:
Designator Agency, entity, office, or plate type
C School district or miscellaneous city or county
agencies, entities or offices
D Highway district
F Fire district
G Fish and game
H Department of health and welfare
ISP Idaho state police
J Department of commerce or department of labor
L Law enforcement


P City police
R Department of parks and recreation
SO Sheriff's office
T Department of transportation
X Miscellaneous state agencies, entities or offices
Y Irrigation district
Z Department of lands
(3) Personalized or specialty license plates are exempt from the provi-
sions of subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.